Utah statutes.
17-32-3.   Term of bail commissioners -- No additional compensation -- Bond
and oath.
(1)  A commissioner appointed under this chapter shall:
(a)  serve at the pleasure of the governing body; and
(b)  receive no additional compensation as a bail commissioner.
(2)  Before beginning his duties as a bail commissioner, he shall:
(a)  take and subscribe an oath to faithfully and impartially discharge the
duties of his office;
(b)  give a $2,500 bond to the county wherein he is appointed, with two good
and sufficient individual sureties or with a single corporate surety that is
approved by the governing body conditioned for the faithful performance of his
duties as a bail commissioner; and
(c)  account for and turn over to the appropriate court within three days
receipt of all money, bonds, property, and records coming into his hands as a
bail commissioner.
(3)  At the expiration of his term of office, a bail commissioner shall
surrender and turn over all funds, bonds, property, paper and records then in
his hands pertaining to his office.
(4)  Suit upon any bond issued under this section may be brought by the county
or any person injured as a result of a bail commissioner's actions.
